Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.350

Fuel tax advisory group.

By July 1, 1996, the department of licensing shall establish a fuel tax advisory group comprised of state agency and petroleum industry representatives to develop or recommend audit and investigation techniques, changes to fuel tax statutes and rules, information protocols that allow sharing of information with other states, and other tools that improve fuel tax administration or combat fuel tax evasion.

[ 1996 c 104 s 18.]